dictsource/ur_rules
.group ہ 
	ہ	H
	_) ہ (L01	H
	_) ہ (ند	HI
	ہّ	H:V
	ہّ (L01	H:

	ہ (_	a#
	_) ہلن	H'Iln
	ہ (L02	HV
	@) ہ (L02L01	H
	_) ہم (L02L02L02P2	H'am
	_)ہیر(L01	Hi:R
	_)ہدایت	HId'a:jat
	ہْ	H
	_)ہجرت	HIJRat
	ی_)ہوا	Hava:
	_)ہچکچ	HIckIc
	_)ہچک(L01	HIck
	_)ہس(ٹ	HIs
	_)ہمت	HIm:at
	_)ہنہن	HInHIn
	_)ہیئت	He:at

.group ۃ
	ۃ	t

.group ٌ
	ٌ	Un

.group ۓ
	ۓ	e:

.group ّ
	ّ	:

.group ْ
	ْ	

.group ٖ
	ٖ	a

.group ٔ
	ٔ	

.group ً
	ً	an


// Common symbols

.group
	$	do:l@R
	,	sakta	// 	Sakta سکتہ
	!	f'iJa:ja	//Fijaya 	فجائیہ
	;	vakfa	//Waqfa 	وقفہ
	:	r'a:b'tah//Rabtar 	رابطہ
	?	saw'a:l'i:ja:n'is'a:nV	// Sawaliya Nishan	سوالیہ نشان
	%	f'i:sVd	//Fisad 	فیصد
	۔	xatma	//Khatma 	ختمہ
	؟	sava:li:;a:||nISa:n	//Sawalya Nishan 	سوالیہ نشان
	؛	vaqfa	//waqfa	وقفہ
	،	sakta	// 	Sakta سکتہ
	؏	mIs.Ra:	// 	misra مصرع
	؎	naz.m||nISa:n	// 	nazm nishan نظم نشان



.group 0xe0a4  // devanagari
	0xe0a4  _^_NE  // switch to Nepali voice
.group 0xe0a5  // devanagari
	0xe0a5  _^_NE
